District of Columbia statutes.
6-731.03

Exemption by Mayor.

The Mayor of the District of Columbia, or his designee, may grant an exemption from the provisions of § 6-731.01 in the event he, or his designee, inspects a housing accommodation wherein there are unvacated units subject to a notice to vacate and finds that a proposed alteration, while it may cause such a rental unit to come to be in substantial violation (or, if already in substantial violation, to be in greater violation) of the housing regulations of the District of Columbia for a period of time in excess of 24 hours, is, nevertheless, necessary for the immediate safety of the habitants of the accommodation.

History

Apr. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 1-129, § 4, 23 DCR 9693

Section References

This section is referenced in § 6-731.01.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 5-527.
1973 Ed., § 5-326.